Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.790

Health care facility inspection and investigation availability.

As resources allow, the department shall make health care facility inspection and investigation statements of deficiencies, plans of correction, notice[s] of acceptance of plans of correction, enforcement actions, and notices of resolution available to the public on the internet, starting with psychiatric hospitals and residential treatment facilities.

[ 2020 c 115 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2020 c 115: See notes following RCW 71.12.700.